Utah statutes.
17B-1-411.   Modifications to area proposed for annexation -- Limitations.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5), a board of trustees
may, within 30 days after the public hearing under Section 17B-1-409, or, if
no public hearing is held, within 30 days after the board provides notice
under Subsection 17B-1-413(2)(a)(i), modify the area proposed for annexation
to include land not previously included in that area or to exclude land from
that area if the modification enhances the feasibility of the proposed
annexation.
(b)  A modification under Subsection (1)(a) may consist of the exclusion of
all the land within an applicable area if:
(i)  the entire area proposed to be annexed consists of more than that
applicable area;
(ii)  sufficient protests under Section 17B-1-412 are filed with respect to
that applicable area that an election would have been required under
Subsection 17B-1-412(3) if that applicable area were the entire area proposed
to be annexed; and
(iii)  the other requirements of Subsection (1)(a) are met.
(2)  A board of trustees may not add property under Subsection (1) to the area
proposed for annexation without the consent of the owner of that property.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a modification under Subsection
(1) may not avoid the requirement for an election under Subsection
17B-1-412(3) if, before the modification, the election was required because of
protests filed under Section 17B-1-412.
(4)  If the annexation is proposed by a petition under Subsection
17B-1-403(1)(a)(ii)(A) or (B), a modification may not be made unless the
requirements of Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a)(ii)(A) or (B) are met after the
modification as to the area proposed to be annexed.
(5)  If the petition meets the requirements of Subsection 17B-1-413(1) before
a modification under this section but fails to meet those requirements after
modification:
(a)  the local district board shall give notice as provided in Section
17B-1-410 and hold a public hearing as provided in Section 17B-1-409 on the
proposed annexation; and
(b)  the petition shall be considered in all respects as one that does not
meet the requirements of Subsection 17B-1-413(1).
